Maryland, session 2026, HB1085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
TITLE 7.5. INSPECTOR GENERAL.
7.5–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “EFFICIENCY RECONSTRUCTION REVIEW” MEANS A HOLISTIC REVIEW
OF A UNIT’S ORGANIZATION AND OPERATIONS TO IDENTIFY INEFFICIENCIES AND
AREAS FOR IMPROVEMENT.
(C) “INSPECTOR GENERAL” MEANS THE INSPECTOR GENERAL OF THE
STATE.
(D) “KEY PERFORMANCE INDICATORS” MEANS QUANTIFIABLE METRICS
DESIGNED TO MEASURE HOW EFFECTIVELY A UNIT IS ACHIEVING OBJECTIVES
RELATED TO EFFICIENCY AND PRODUCTIVITY.
(E) “OFFICE” MEANS THE MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL.
(F) “TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION” MEANS THE STATE TRANSPARENCY
COMMISSION.
(G) “UNIT” MEANS AN AGENCY OR A UNIT OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF
STATE GOVERNMENT.
7.5–102.
(A) THERE IS A STATE TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION.
(B) THE TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION IS COMPOSED OF THE FOLLOWING
MEMBERS:
(1) THE GOVERNOR;
(2) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE; AND
(3) THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE.

HOUSE BILL 1085 3
(C) ALL MEMBERS OF THE TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION ARE REQUIRED
FOR THE TRANSACTION OF BUSINESS BY THE TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION.
(D) (1) THE TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION SHALL APPOINT THE
INSPECTOR GENERAL WITHOUT REGARD TO POLITICAL AFFILIATION ON THE
AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF NOT LESS THAN TWO MEMBERS.
(2) THE TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION MAY REMOVE THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL ON THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF NOT LESS THAN TWO MEMBERS FOR:
(I) MISCONDUCT IN OFFICE;
(II) PERSISTENT FAILURE TO PERFORM THE DUTIES OF THE
OFFICE; OR
(III) CONDUCT PREJUDICIAL TO THE PROPER ADMINISTRATION
OF JUSTICE.
(E) (1) (I) IN THE EVENT THAT THE POSITION OF INSPECTOR
GENERAL REMAINS VACANT FOR A PERIOD IN EXCESS OF 180 DAYS, THE
TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE 181ST DAY AND
EVERY 60TH DAY THEREAFTER UNTIL THE VACANCY IS FILLED.
(II) FOR THE PURPOSE OF CALCULATING TIME UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE POSITION OF INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL BE DEEMED VACANT
FOLLOWING:
1. THE RESIGNATION OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL;
2. THE REMOVAL OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS SECTION; OR
3. THE END OF THE TERM FOR THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE INSPECTOR GENERAL CONTINUES TO
SERVE UNDER § 7.5–103(B)(3) OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE A REVIEW OF:
(I) THE ONGOING EFFORTS TO APPOINT A NEW INSPECTOR
GENERAL; AND

HOUSE BILL 1085
(II) THE ACTIVITIES OF THE OFFICE DURING THE VACANCY.
7.5–103.
(A) THERE IS AN INSPECTOR GENERAL OF THE STATE.
(B) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE
TRANSPARENCY COMMISSION.
(2) THE TERM OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS 6 YEARS, BEGINNING
JULY 1 AFTER THE APPOINTMENT OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL
CONTINUE TO SERVE UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED.
(C) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MUST BE PROFESSIONALLY
QUALIFIED THROUGH EXPERIENCE OR EDUCATION IN AT LEAST ONE OF THE
FOLLOWING AREAS:
(I) AUDITING;
(II) FINANCIAL ANALYSIS;
(III) BUSINESS MANAGEMENT;
(IV) PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION;
(V) CRIMINAL JUSTICE; OR
(VI) LAW.
(2) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MUST BE CERTIFIED BY THE
ASSOCIATION OF INSPECTORS GENERAL AS A CERTIFIED INSPECTOR GENERAL OR
SHALL OBTAIN CERTIFICATION WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER APPOINTMENT.
(D) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS ENTITLED TO:
(1) THE SALARY PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET; AND
(2) REIMBURSEMENT FOR TRAVEL AND OTHER EXPENSES THAT ARE
CONNECTED WITH THE DUTIES OF THE OFFICE.
7.5–104.

HOUSE BILL 1085 5
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
(B) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL SUPERVISE AND DIRECT THE OFFICE.
(C) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY ESTABLISH OFFICE SPACE THAT
THE STATE SHALL MAINTAIN AND EQUIP.
(2) FUNDING FOR THE OFFICE SHALL BE AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
7.5–105.
(A) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY EMPLOY A STAFF IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(2) STAFF EMPLOYED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) SHALL:
1. PERFORM THE DUTIES THAT THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL ASSIGNS; AND
2. CARRY IDENTIFICATION CARDS THAT IDENTIFY THE
STAFF AS EMPLOYEES OF THE OFFICE;
(II) SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL;
AND
(III) ARE ENTITLED TO:
1. COMPENSATION AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET;
AND
2. REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(B) FROM AMONG THE EMPLOYEES ON THE STAFF, THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL MAY DESIGNATE ONE CHIEF DEPUTY INSPECTOR GENERAL AND ONE OR
MORE DEPUTY INSPECTORS GENERAL.
7.5–106.

HOUSE BILL 1085
(A) THE CHIEF DEPUTY INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL SERVE AS ACTING
INSPECTOR GENERAL IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS TEMPORARILY UNABLE OR
UNAVAILABLE TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES OF THE OFFICE.
(B) IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL GIVES THE CHIEF DEPUTY INSPECTOR
GENERAL WRITTEN NOTICE OF A TEMPORARY INABILITY OR UNAVAILABILITY:
(1) THE ACTING INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL SERVE ON AND AFTER
THE DATE THAT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SETS IN THE NOTICE AND UNTIL THE
INSPECTOR GENERAL GIVES THE ACTING INSPECTOR GENERAL WRITTEN NOTICE
THAT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS ABLE TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES OF THE
OFFICE; AND
(2) THE POSITION OF INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY NOT BE DEEMED
VACANT.
7.5–107.
(A) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL:
(I) RECEIVE COMPLAINTS OF WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT,
MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION IN THE UNITS; AND
(II) ESTABLISH A TOLL–FREE HOTLINE NUMBER AND WEBSITE
THROUGH WHICH ANONYMOUS COMPLAINTS MAY BE FILED.
(2) IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL RECEIVES A COMPLAINT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL
DETERMINE WHETHER THE COMPLAINT SHOULD BE INVESTIGATED.
(B) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL IMPLEMENT TECHNOLOGY
POWERED BY ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO AUTOMATICALLY FLAG POTENTIAL
INSTANCES OF WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT, MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR
CORRUPTION WITHIN THE UNITS IN REAL TIME, INCLUDING UNUSUAL
TRANSACTIONS, DUPLICATE BILLING ERRORS, AND PROCUREMENT ANOMALIES.
(2) IF THE TECHNOLOGY IMPLEMENTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION FLAGS A POTENTIAL INSTANCE OF WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT,
MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL
DETERMINE WHETHER THE INSTANCE SHOULD BE INVESTIGATED.
(C) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL ESTABLISH:

HOUSE BILL 1085 7
(I) KEY PERFORMANCE INDICATORS FOR EACH UNIT; AND
(II) ANNUAL GOALS FOR EACH UNIT TO MEET BASED ON THE
KEY PERFORMANCE INDICATORS.
(2) IF A UNIT FAILS TO MEET THE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR 2 CONSECUTIVE YEARS, THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL SHALL:
(I) CONDUCT AN EFFICIENCY RECONSTRUCTION REVIEW OF
THE UNIT; AND
(II) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE TRANSPARENCY
COMMISSION REGARDING MEASURES THAT COULD BE TAKEN TO ADDRESS THE
EFFICIENCY RECONSTRUCTION REVIEW’S FINDINGS.
(D) IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL DISCOVERS EVIDENCE OF CRIMINAL
ACTIVITY IN THE COURSE OF CARRYING OUT THE DUTIES UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL NOTIFY THE APPROPRIATE LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY.
7.5–108.
(A) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL:
(1) MAY INVESTIGATE:
(I) COMPLAINTS OF WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT, MISCONDUCT,
ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION IN THE UNITS; AND
(II) POTENTIAL INSTANCES OF WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT,
MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION FLAGGED BY TECHNOLOGY
IMPLEMENTED BY THE INSPECTOR GENERAL;
(2) MAY CONDUCT AUDITS AND EFFICIENCY RECONSTRUCTION
REVIEWS OF THE UNITS;
(3) MAY PROCURE AND IMPLEMENT TECHNOLOGY POWERED BY
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO FLAG POTENTIAL INSTANCES OF WASTE,
MISMANAGEMENT, MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION WITHIN THE
UNITS IN REAL TIME;

HOUSE BILL 1085
(4) SHALL COOPERATE WITH INVESTIGATIONS BY THE UNITS OR
OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL AGENCIES AND, IF A PRELIMINARY INVESTIGATION OF
WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT, MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION
ESTABLISHES A SUFFICIENT BASIS TO WARRANT REFERRAL, SHALL REFER THE
MATTER TO THE APPROPRIATE STATE OR FEDERAL ENFORCEMENT OFFICIALS; AND
(5) IN CARRYING OUT THE DUTIES UNDER ITEMS (1) THROUGH (4) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, SHALL TAKE STEPS TO ENSURE THAT A PERSON OR UNIT
SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE OFFICE IS NOT SUBJECT TO DUPLICATIVE
INVESTIGATIONS OR AUDITS.
(B) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY NOT DISCLOSE THE IDENTITY OF
THE SOURCE OF A COMPLAINT OR INFORMATION PROVIDED UNDER § 7.5–107 OF
THIS TITLE UNLESS THE INSPECTOR GENERAL:
(I) OBTAINS THE WRITTEN CONSENT OF THE SOURCE; OR
(II) DETERMINES THAT DISCLOSURE OF THE IDENTITY OF THE
SOURCE IS NECESSARY AND UNAVOIDABLE DURING THE COURSE OF THE
INVESTIGATION.
(2) IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL DETERMINES THAT DISCLOSURE OF
THE IDENTITY OF A SOURCE IS NECESSARY AND UNAVOIDABLE, THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL SHALL NOTIFY THE SOURCE IN WRITING AT LEAST 7 DAYS BEFORE
DISCLOSURE.
(C) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL PERIODICALLY SHALL:
(1) REVIEW THE POLICIES AND PROCEDURES OF THE UNITS; AND
(2) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO IMPROVE THE POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES OF THE UNITS.
(D) A STATE EMPLOYEE WHO MAKES A COMPLAINT OR PROVIDES
INFORMATION UNDER § 7.5–107 OF THIS TITLE SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE
PROTECTIONS ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE
PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE.
7.5–109.
(A) A UNIT SHALL COOPERATE FULLY WITH THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IN
AN INVESTIGATION, AUDIT, OR EFFICIENCY RECONSTRUCTION REVIEW THAT IS
CONDUCTED BY THE OFFICE.

HOUSE BILL 1085 9
(B) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL HAVE ACCESS TO ALL RECORDS,
DATA, REPORTS, CONTRACTS, CORRESPONDENCE, OR OTHER DOCUMENTS OF A
UNIT DURING AN INVESTIGATION, AUDIT, OR EFFICIENCY RECONSTRUCTION
REVIEW CONDUCTED BY THE OFFICE.
(C) IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE DUTIES OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL,
THE INSPECTOR GENERAL OR THE INSPECTOR GENERAL’S DESIGNEE MAY:
(1) SEEK AND OBTAIN SWORN TESTIMONY;
(2) COMPEL THE ATTENDANCE OF WITNESSES TO BE DEPOSED BY THE
OFFICE; AND
(3) COMPEL THE PRODUCTION OF RECORDS BY ISSUING A SUBPOENA
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY ISSUE A SUBPOENA OR SUBPOENA
DUCES TECUM ONLY WITH THE APPROVAL OF A JUDGE OF THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR
THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE OFFICE IS LOCATED.
(2) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL SUBMIT A WRITTEN
APPLICATION FOR THE APPROVAL SOUGHT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(3) A CIRCUIT COURT SHALL ISSUE A WRITTEN DECISION ON AN
APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 72
HOURS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION.
(4) A SUBPOENA ISSUED BY THE INSPECTOR GENERAL UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE SERVED IN THE SAME MANNER AS A SUBPOENA ISSUED BY A
CIRCUIT COURT.
(E) IF A PERSON REFUSES TO OBEY A SUBPOENA ISSUED BY THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT THAT APPROVED
THE ISSUANCE OF THE SUBPOENA UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION MAY:
(1) ISSUE AN ORDER TO THE PERSON REQUIRING THE PERSON TO
APPEAR BEFORE THE COURT TO SHOW CAUSE; AND
(2) AFTER CONDUCTING A HEARING, GRANT APPROPRIATE RELIEF.
7.5–110.

HOUSE BILL 1085
(A) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS TITLE.
(B) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP AN OPERATIONS MANUAL THAT CONFORMS TO THE
STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE ASSOCIATION OF INSPECTORS GENERAL;
(2) MAKE THE OPERATIONS MANUAL AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC ON
THE OFFICE’S WEBSITE; AND
(3) PROVIDE TRAINING AND EDUCATION FOR THE UNITS.
7.5–111.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, RECORDS
PREPARED OR OBTAINED BY THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IN CONNECTION WITH AN
INVESTIGATION, AUDIT, OR EFFICIENCY RECONSTRUCTION REVIEW CONDUCTED BY
THE OFFICE ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER THE
PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT UNTIL THE FINAL REPORT ON THE INVESTIGATION OR
AUDIT IS ISSUED UNDER § 7.5–112(B) OF THIS TITLE.
(B) IF AN INDIVIDUAL REQUESTS A PUBLIC RECORD UNDER THE PUBLIC
INFORMATION ACT AND THE ONLY COPY OF THE PUBLIC RECORD HAS BEEN
OBTAINED BY THE INSPECTOR GENERAL, THE CUSTODIAN OF THE PUBLIC RECORD
SHALL CERTIFY THAT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS IN POSSESSION OF THE ONLY
COPY OF THE RECORD AND THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL ALLOW THE
INDIVIDUAL TO EXAMINE AND COPY THE RECORD.
(C) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DISCLOSES A RECORD PROTECTED FROM
DISCLOSURE UNDER THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND IS SUBJECT
TO A FINE NOT TO EXCEED $2,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT TO EXCEED 1 YEAR OR
BOTH.
7.5–112.
(A) (1) AT THE END OF EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL
SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) THE ANNUAL REPORT SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1085 11
(I) DESCRIBE THE BUSINESS AND PROCEEDINGS OF THE
OFFICE DURING THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR; AND
(II) INCLUDE ANY RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE
ACTIVITIES OF THE UNITS THAT THE INSPECTOR GENERAL CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE.
(B) (1) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL ISSUE A FINAL REPORT ON AN
INVESTIGATION, AUDIT, OR EFFICIENCY RECONSTRUCTION REVIEW COMPLETED BY
THE OFFICE.
(2) THE FINAL REPORT ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, BEFORE RELEASING A FINAL REPORT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR
THE UNIT THAT WAS THE SUBJECT OF THE INVESTIGATION, AUDIT, OR EFFICIENCY
RECONSTRUCTION REVIEW TO RESPOND TO THE REPORT.
(II) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE
AN OPPORTUNITY FOR RESPONSE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
IF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL, IN CONJUNCTION WITH A UNITED STATES ATTORNEY,
AN ATTORNEY GENERAL, A STATE’S ATTORNEY, OR ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE
PROSECUTORIAL AGENCY, DETERMINES THAT ALLOWING THE UNIT TO RESPOND
WOULD JEOPARDIZE A PENDING OR POTENTIAL CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION.
(C) A REPORT ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE POSTED TO THE OFFICE’S WEBSITE.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
5–305.
Subject to the limitations of § 5–306 of this subtitle, a supervisor, appointing
authority, or the head of a principal unit may not take or refuse to take any personnel
action as a reprisal against:
(1) an employee who discloses information that the employee reasonably
believes evidences:
(i) an abuse of authority, gross mismanagement, or gross waste of
money;

HOUSE BILL 1085
(ii) a substantial and specific danger to public health or safety; or
(iii) a violation of law;
(2) an employee of the Department of Juvenile Services who discloses
information to the Director of Juvenile Justice Monitoring or staff of the Office of the
Correctional Ombudsman, including the Juvenile Justice Monitoring Unit relating to the
Unit’s duties under § 9–4014 of the State Government Article;
(3) an employee of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services who discloses information to the Correctional Ombudsman or staff of the Office of
the Correctional Ombudsman relating to the Office’s duties under § 9–4004 of the State
Government Article; [or]
(4) AN EMPLOYEE WHO MAKES A COMPLAINT OR PROVIDES
INFORMATION TO THE INSPECTOR GENERAL OF THE STATE OR STAFF OF THE
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL RELATING TO WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT,
MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION;
(5) an employee who, following a disclosure under item (1), (2), [or] (3), OR
(4) of this section, seeks a remedy provided under this subtitle or any other law or policy
governing the employee’s unit.
5–306.
Section 5–305 of this subtitle applies to a disclosure that is specifically prohibited by
law only if that disclosure is made exclusively to the Attorney General OR THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL OF THE STATE in the manner allowed in § 5–313 of this subtitle.
5–313.
(A) For purposes of this subtitle, the Attorney General shall:
(1) designate an assistant Attorney General to receive from applicants and
employees any information the disclosure of which is otherwise protected by law;
(2) investigate each allegation of illegality or impropriety;
(3) take appropriate legal action; and
(4) if the investigation concerns an allegation of illegality or impropriety in
the Executive Branch, submit a confidential report to the Governor that describes the
content of the disclosure.

HOUSE BILL 1085 13
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE INSPECTOR GENERAL OF THE
STATE SHALL, IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 7.5 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE:
(1) INVESTIGATE EACH COMPLAINT OF WASTE, MISMANAGEMENT,
MISCONDUCT, ABUSE, FRAUD, OR CORRUPTION MADE BY AN EMPLOYEE; AND
(2) TAKE APPROPRIATE LEGAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Governor may transfer
positions and funds appropriated for the positions from agencies, departments, or units of
the Executive Branch of State government to the Maryland Office of the Inspector General
established under Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That all employees who are
transferred to the Maryland Office of the Inspector General as a result of this Act shall be
transferred without diminution of their rights, benefits, employment, or retirement status.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.